Hawaii, session 2025, GM1343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
. PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that access for
qualifying patients and primary caregivers to medical cannabis
and particularly licensed medical cannabis dispensaries remains
challenging due to limited access to medical providers, delays
in obtaining allowed access to enter and purchase medical
cannabis, and the availability of cannabis through a thriving
illicit market.
The legislature further finds that registration for the
medical cannabis program has decreased in the last few years.
While the number of registered medical cannabis patients reached
its peak in August 2021, with 35,444 card-holding patients,
since then, the number of patients has decreased over fifteen
per cent to 30,035 by November 2024. This appears to indicate
that residents are shifting away from licensed medical cannabis
dispensaries, and instead are obtaining their medical cannabis
from elsewhere due to administrative barriers, delays in
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO
iiniMMiiiNiiiiiMiiniii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
registering, and the ease and lower costs in obtaining cannabis
elsewhere•
The legislature also finds that this apparent shift away
from licensed medical cannabis dispensaries toward the illicit
market undermines the purposes of the medical cannabis program
in ensuring patient safety, product safety, and public safety.
The legislature additionally finds that Act 34, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2021, amended existing law governing physicians
by eliminating the requirement for a physician-patient
relationship to be established by an initial in-person
consultation, and authorized the relationship to be established
via telehealth.
The purpose of this part is to make various amendments to
the medical use of cannabis and medical cannabis dispensaries
laws by:
(1) Authorizing the department of health to inspect a
qualifying patient's medical records that are held by
the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
hospice provider who issued a written certification
for the qualifying patient;
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO
iiiimMiiiiiiiHiiiiiinii

Page 3 H.B. NO 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(2) Amending definitions of "qualifying patient" and
"written certification" and adding a definition of
"primary treating medical provider";
(3) Clarifying the conditions of use for the medical use
of cannabis;
(4) Authorizing the establishment of a provider-patient
relationship via telehealth for purposes of issuing
written certifications and limiting the maximum fee a
provider may assess for issuing a written
certification;
(5) Authorizing the sale of hemp products and accessories
to the medical use of cannabis at retail dispensing
locations, except in the waiting room; and
(6) Clarifying the transportation requirements for certain
types of dispensary-to-dispensary purchases of
cannabis or manufactured cannabis products.
SECTION 2. Chapter 329, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part IX to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§329- Qualifying patient medical records; inspection
and enforcement; authority. (a) The department may inspect a
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 3
nilllllllliMIRRII

Page 4 H.B. NO 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
qualifying patient's medical records held by the physician,
advanced practice registered nurse, or hospice provider who
issued a written certification for the qualifying patient.
(b) The department may suspend or revoke the ability to
issue a written certification for any physician, advanced
practice registered nurse, or hospice provider who refuses
inspection of a qualifying patient's medical records by the
department pursuant to this section.
(c) The department may suspend or revoke the ability to
issue a written certification for any physician, advanced
practice registered nurse, or hospice provider whose medical
records do not comply with the requirements of this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 329-121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding a new definition to be appropriate inserted
and to read:
""Primary treating medical provider" means a physician or
an advanced practice registered nurse located in, and with an
active unrestricted license to practice in, the State who,
within the physician's or advanced practice registered nurse's
scope of practice and individual competency, is primarily
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO
IIINMIilllRIIIIffillll

Page 5
H.B. NO.
I . . 'I g 2
C.D. 1
responsible for the treatment and ongoing care of the qualifying
patient and has determined that the potential benefits of the
medical use of cannabis are likely to outweigh the associated
health risks for the qualifying patient."
2. By amending the definition of "qualifying patient" to
read:
""Qualifying patient" means a person who [ha&]j_
(1) Has been diagnosed [by a phyo-i-Gian or advanced
prae-tice rogiatcrcd nuroo] as having a debilitating
medical condition[—] by a physician or advanced
practice registered nurse who has certified in writing
that, jn the physician’s or advanced practice
registered nurse's professional opinion, the benefit
of the medical use of cannabis would likely outweigh
the health risks for the person;
(2) Has been diagnosed as having a condition other than a
debilitating medical condition by the person's primary
treating medical provider who has certified in writing
that, in the primary treating medical provider's
professional opinion, the potential benefits of the
2025-3334 HB302 GDI HMSO


Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
medical use of cannabis would likely outweigh the
health risks for the person; or
(3) Is receiving hospice care and the hospice provider
licensed in the State has certified in writing that
the person is receiving hospice care."
3. By amending the definition of "written certification"
to read:
""Written certification" means the qualifying patient’s
medical records or a statement signed by a qualifying patient's
physician [©£^1^ advanced practice registered nurse, or hospice
provider, stating that in the physician's advanced
practice registered nurse's, or hospice provider's professional
opinion, the qualifying patient has a [debilitating medical
condition—and] condition for which the potential benefits of
the medical use of cannabis would likely outweigh the health
risks for the qualifying patient. The department of health may
require, through its rulemaking authority, that all written
certifications comply with a designated form. "Written
certifications" are valid for one year from the time of signing;
provided that the department of health may allow for the
validity of any written certification for three years if the
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO
ll■lHiiMilg||||||||g||

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
qualifying patient's physician or advanced practice registered
nurse states that the patient's [defeiiirtafeiftg-^fte4i-eai] condition
is chronic in nature."
SECTION 4. Section 329-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the medical
use of cannabis by a qualifying patient eighteen years of age or
older shall be permitted only if:
1-H4- ^-ho qualifying patient -hao bocn-diagnooGd by a
phyoiol-a-n—er—advanced practice rcgiotorcd euree—ae
having■-a--debilifting medical condition;
-fS-b The qualifying patien-t’-s- phyoic-l-an or advanced
p-ractice registered nur-ee hao certified in writing
that,—in-the phy-sician'o or advanced practice
regiotcrcd nurse's profcooional--opinion,—the potential
benefits of the-medical—use of cannabis would likely
outweigh the health rieks' for the parti-eular
qualifyi-ng- patient;—and
-(-39-] (1) The physician, advanced practice registered
nurse, or hospice provider who has determined the
patient to be a qualifying patient has explained the
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO
iHinniiiiouiiiiiHHiiii

Page 8 H.B. NO 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
potential risks and benefits of the medical use of
cannabis to the qualifying patient and documented in
the qualifying patient's medical record that the
qualifying patient understands the potential risks and
benefits of the medical use of cannabis; and
(2) The amount of cannabis possessed by the qualifying
patient does not exceed an adequate supply.
(b) [gubsGGt-ion—(-a4—shall not apply to] Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the medical use of cannabis by a
qualifying patient under the age of eighteen years [, un-loosi ]
shall be permitted only if;
(1) The [qualifying patient's] physician [et]^ advanced
practice registered nurse, or hospice provider who has
determined the patient to be a qualifying patient has
explained the potential risks and benefits of the
medical use of cannabis to the qualifying patient and
to a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody
of the qualifying patient [-^] and documented in the
qualifying patient's medical record that the
qualifying patient and the parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of the qualifying patient
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO
■lOIIIHIIIIHIillHill

Page 9 H.B. NO 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
understand the potential risks and benefits of the
medical use of cannabis; and
(2) A parent, guardian, or person having legal custody
consents in writing to:
(A) Allow the gualifying patient’s medical use of
cannabis;
(B) Serve as the qualifying patient's primary
caregiver; and
(C) Control the acquisition of the cannabis, the
dosage, and the frequency of the medical use of
cannabis by the qualifying patient."
SECTION 5. Section 329-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Physicians or advanced practice registered nurses who
issue written certifications shall provide, in each written
certification, the name, address, patient identification number,
and other identifying information of the qualifying patient. A
written certification issued pursuant to this subsection shall
originate from within the State. The department of health shall
require, in rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, that all
written certifications comply with a designated form completed
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 9

Page 10 H.B. NO.
“.2
C.D. 1
by or on behalf of a qualifying patient. The form shall require
information from the applicant, primary caregiver, and physician
or advanced practice registered nurse as specifically required
or permitted by this chapter. The form shall require the
address of the location where the cannabis is grown and shall
appear on the registry card issued by the department of health.
The certifying physician or advanced practice registered nurse
shall be required to have a bona fide physician-patient
relationship or bona fide advanced practice registered nurse­
patient relationship, as applicable, with the qualifying
patient [-r] ; provided that nothing under this part shall require
that the bona fide physician-patient relationship or bona fide
advanced practice registered nurse-patient relationship be
established by conducting an initial in-person consultation.
Any fees assessed by a certifying physician or advanced practice
registered nurse to issue a written certification pursuant to
this subsection shall not exceed an amount equal to three times
the amount of the fee charged by the department of health to
issue a registration certificate pursuant to subsection (b).
All current active medical cannabis permits shall be honored
through their expiration date."
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 1
iiiiiiMimiiiiMiii

Page 11 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 6. Section 329-126, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) For purposes of this section, a bona fide
physician-patient relationship may be established via
telehealth, as defined in section 453-1.3 (j), and a bona fide
advanced practice registered nurse-patient relationship may be
established via telehealth, as defined in section 457-2;
provided that nothing under this part shall require that
treatment recommendations that include certifying a patient for
the medical use of cannabis via telehealth [efeaii] be allowed
only after an initial in-person consultation between the
certifying physician or advanced practice registered nurse and
the patient."
SECTION 7. Section 329D-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending the definition of "retail dispensing
location" to read:
""Retail dispensing location" means an establishment owned,
operated, or subcontracted by a medical cannabis dispensary
where cannabis [and]^ manufactured cannabis products, hemp
products, and accessories to the medical use of cannabis,
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO ]
IIIHIIHHIIIilHIW

Page 12 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
including but not limited to rolling papers^ rolling trays,
grinders, and vaporizers, are made available for retail sale to
a qualifying patient, primary caregiver, qualifying out-of-state
patient, or caregiver of a qualifying out-of-state patient."
2. By amending the definition of "waiting room" to read:
""Waiting room" means a designated area at the public
entrance of a retail dispensing location that may be accessed by
a member of the general public who is waiting for, assisting, or
accompanying a qualifying patient, primary caregiver, qualifying
out-of-state patient, or caregiver of a qualifying out-of-state
patient who enters or remains on the premises of a retail
dispensing location for the purpose of a transaction conducted
pursuant to sections 329D-6 and 329D-13; provided that the
storage, display, and retail sale of cannabis
manufactured cannabis products, hemp products, and accessories
to the medical use of cannabis, including but not limited to
rolling papers, rolling trays, grinders, and vaporizers, shall
be prohibited within the waiting room area."
SECTION 8. Section 329D-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (r) to read as follows:
2025-3334 HB302 GDI HMSO 12
IMHinilHIIMillllMI

Page 13 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"(r) A dispensary may purchase cannabis and manufactured
cannabis products from another dispensary. The department shall
authorize a dispensary to purchase cannabis and manufactured
cannabis products from another dispensary in a manner prescribed
by the department by rules adopted pursuant to section 329D-27;
provided that:
(1) The selling dispensary may transport not more than
eight hundred ounces, or other amounts with prior
approval by the department, of cannabis or
manufactured cannabis products to the purchasing
dispensary within a thirty-day period; provided
further that cannabis and manufactured cannabis
products purchased pursuant to this section intended
for:
(A) Direct retail sale to qualifying patients shall
meet all applicable packaging, labeling, and
testing requirements at the time of transport to
the purchasing dispensary's production center or
one of its retail dispensing locations; and
(B) Further manufacturing by the purchasing
dispensary at the time of transportation shall be
2025-3334 HB302 GDI HMSO

iinillMIIIIIIOHiHII

Page 14 H.B. NO 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
transported to the purchasing dispensary's
production center;
(2) The cannabis and manufactured cannabis products are
transported between the dispensaries for medical
S sales, scientific use, or other legitimate purposes
approved by the State; [and]
(3) The selling dispensary shall submit a transport
manifest of the cannabis or manufactured cannabis
products to be sold to the department before the sale
is made, after which the selling dispensary may
immediately proceed with the transfer of the cannabis
or manufactured cannabis products; and
[•434-] (4) Nothing in this subsection shall relieve any
dispensary of its responsibilities and obligations
under this chapter and chapter 329."
SECTION 9. Section 453-1.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) Treatment recommendations made via telehealth,
including issuing a prescription via electronic means, shall be
held to the same standards of appropriate practice as those in
traditional physician-patient settings that do not include
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 14
IIIIIHIHIIIIIIIIIIiHIIII

Page 15 H.B. NO 302
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
[-E]an[-3-] in-person visit but in which prescribing is
appropriate, including on-call telephone encounters and
encounters for which a follow-up visit is arranged. Issuing a
prescription based solely on an online questionnaire is not
treatment for the purposes of this section and does not
constitute an acceptable standard of care. For the purposes of
prescribing opiates [or eer-tlfy-ing a patient for the medical -u-og
of ea-nnabio], a physician-patient relationship shall only be
established after an in-person consultation between the
prescribing physician and the patient."
PART II
SECTION 10. The purpose of this part is to establish
criminal penalties for the unlicensed operation of a medical
cannabis dispensary.
SECTION 11. Chapter 329D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§329D- Unlicensed operation of a dispensary; criminal
penalty. (a) No person shall intentionally, knowingly, or
recklessly operate a dispensary without a license issued by the
department pursuant to this chapter.
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 15
llllilHIMINiniilllll

Page 16 H.B. NO. 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(b) No person shall intentionally^ knowingly, or
recklessly operate any search platform, web hosting service,
social media platform, or other service that posts information
advertising the sale of cannabis or manufactured cannabis
products by a person or entity engaged in the production,
manufacture, or sale of cannabis and manufactured cannabis
products without a license issued by the department pursuant to
this chapter.
(c) The department shall issue a cease and desist notice
to any person who violates subsections (a) or (b); provided that
the department shall issue the cease and desist notice before
initiating any criminal proceedings.
(d) Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be guilty
of a class C felony. Any person who violates subsection (b)
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(e) It shall be an affirmative defense to subsection (b)
that the person operating any search platform, web hosting
service, social media platform, or other service that posts
information advertising the sale of cannabis or manufactured
cannabis products had requested, examined, and reasonably relied
upon a license that appeared to have been issued by the
2025-3334 HB302 GDI HMSO 1
IIIIIHIIHIIMiniHI

Page 17 H.B. NO 302
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
department that was shown to the person by the unlicensed person
or unlicensed entity engaged in the production^ manufacture, or
sale of cannabis or manufactured cannabis products establishing
that the unlicensed person or unlicensed entity was licensed by
the department to engage in the production, manufacture, or sale
of cannabis or manufactured cannabis products pursuant to this
chapter. The failure of the person operating any search
platform, web hosting service, social media platform, or other
service that posts information advertising the sale of cannabis
and manufactured cannabis products to request and examine a
license issued by the department from the unlicensed person or
unlicensed entity engaged in the production, manufacture, or
sale of cannabis or manufactured cannabis products before
providing access to any search platform, web hosting service,
social media platform, or other service that posts information
advertising the sale of cannabis and manufactured cannabis
products shall be construed against the person operating the
search platform, web hosting service, social media platform, or
other service that posts information advertising the sale of
cannabis and manufactured cannabis products and form a
conclusive basis for the person's violation of this section.
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 1'
IIIMIHIIIIIIIIHHIII

Page 18
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(f) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Hemp processors or hemp product retailers with a valid
permit under chapter 328G; or
(2) Primary caregivers registered under chapter 329 who
are acting within the scope of their registration."
PART III
SECTION 12. The purpose of this part is to:
(1) Authorize expenditures from the medical cannabis
registry and regulation special fund to fund programs
for the mitigation and abatement of nuisances related
to illegal cannabis and hemp products or medical
cannabis dispensaries; and
(2) Appropriate funds to the department of the attorney
general's drug nuisance abatement unit for these
purposes.
SECTION 13. Section 28-131, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) The purpose of the drug nuisance abatement unit shall
be to provide for the effective enforcement and prosecution of
those violations of the drug nuisance abatement laws under
chapter 712, part V but only for offenses related to drugs and
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO li
HNIIIIHilinilillll

Page 19 H.B. NO. “L
C.D. 1
intoxicating compounds as provided under chapter 712, part IV[—]
and violations of chapter 329D as provided under section
712-1270 . The drug nuisance [-{•] abatement [+] unit may also
review and take appropriate action on drug nuisance complaints
of any citizen of the State, or drug nuisances that are
discovered by the unit in carrying out its activities."
SECTION 14. Section 321-30.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) There is established within the state treasury the
medical cannabis registry and regulation special fund. The fund
shall be expended at the discretion of the director of health:
(1) To establish and regulate a system of medical cannabis
dispensaries in the State;
(2) To offset the cost of the processing and issuance of
patient registry identification certificates and
primary caregiver registration certificates;
(3) To fund positions and operating costs authorized by
the legislature;
(4) To establish and manage a secure and confidential
database;
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO

iKiHimuMniHniiiii

Page 20 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) To fund public education as required by section
329D-26;
(6) To fund substance abuse prevention and education
programs; [and]
(7) To fund programs for the mitigation and abatement of
nuisances relating to illegal cannabis and hemp
products and chapter 329D; and
[4-7-)-] (8) For any other expenditure necessary, consistent
with this chapter and chapter 329D, to implement
medical cannabis registry and regulation programs."
SECTION 15. There is appropriated out of the medical
cannabis registry and regulation special fund the sum of
$750,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of the
attorney general to enforce, and mitigate nuisances relating to,
illegal cannabis and hemp- products and chapter 329D, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, and to establish, recruit, and hire the
following positions:
(1) Four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) investigator V
positions;
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 2
lOlillllllllMlilHH

Page 21 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) investigator IV
position; and
(3) One full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) analyst position.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the attorney
general for the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 16. The purpose of this part is to prohibit the
cultivation of cannabis without a cannabis cultivator license
issued by the department of health.
SECTION 17. Chapter 329D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§329D- Cannabis cultivator; license required. (a)
Notwithstanding section 329D-24, it shall be unlawful for any
person to cultivate cannabis without a license issued by the
department pursuant to this section.
(b) A cannabis cultivator license shall authorize the
licensee to:
(1) Acquire and cultivate cannabis plants, seeds,
cuttdmgs^or clones2 a^
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 21
MMIIHIIIini

Page 22 H.■ B. .. N'I O.
g “2.2
C.D. 1
(2) Distribute cannabis plants and cannabis flower to a
medical cannabis dispensary.
(c) The department shall issue no more than one cannabis
cultivator license for each person.
(d) A person issued a cannabis cultivator license under
this section shall meet all production facility and processing
requirements of this chapter.”
PART V
SECTION 18. This Act does not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that
were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 19. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 20. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025/
provided that part IV of this Act shall take effect on
January 1, 2028; provided further that the amendments made to
section 453-1.3(c), Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 9 of
this Act shall not be repealed when that section is reenacted on
December 31, 2025, pursuant to section 8 of Act 107, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2023.
2025-3334 HB302 CDl HMSO 22
imiimiMiiiii

302
H.B. NO.
±
w

ci
ci
Q
CM
CM
APPROVED this 27th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 302, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 302, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
.Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
255